Hawaii statutes.
[§346-305] Effect on prior adoption
assistance agreements. Nothing in this part shall invalidate any adoption
assistance agreement already entered into or benefits previously provided by
the department of human services nor shall require a reduction of benefits
already being provided. [L 1992, c 190, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"Part" substituted for "act" pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next